District of Columbia statutes.
25-901

Taxes to be levied, collected, and paid on alcoholic beverages except beer.

There shall be levied, collected, and paid on all of the following alcoholic beverages (1) manufactured by the licensee under a manufacturer’s license, (2) imported or brought into the District by a licensee under a wholesaler’s license, except alcoholic beverages as may be sold to a dealer licensed under the laws of any state or territory of the United States and not licensed under this title, and (3) imported or brought into the District by a licensee under a retailer’s license, a tax at the following rates to be paid by the licensee in the manner hereinafter provided:

(A)

A tax of $.30 on every wine-gallon of wine containing 14% or less of alcohol by volume, other than champagne, sparkling wine, and any wine artificially carbonated, and a proportionate tax at the same rate on all fractional parts of such gallon;

(B)

A tax of $.40 on every wine-gallon of wine containing more than 14% of alcohol by volume, other than champagne, sparkling wine, and any wine artificially carbonated, and a proportionate tax at the same rate on all fractional parts of such gallon;

(C)

A tax of $.45 on every wine-gallon of champagne, sparkling wine, and any wine artificially carbonated, and a proportionate tax at the same rate on all fractional parts of such gallon;

(D)

A tax of $1.50 on every wine-gallon of spirits, and a proportionate tax at the same rate on all fractional parts of such gallon; and

(E)

A tax of $1.50 on every wine-gallon of all other alcoholic beverages, and a proportionate tax at the same rate on all fractional parts of such gallon.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 332, ch. 4, § 23
Apr. 30, 1934, 48 Stat. 654, ch. 181, § 3
June 18, 1934, 48 Stat. 1014, 1015, ch. 600, §§ 1, 2
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 901, 903, ch. 756, §§ 11, 17
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 135, ch. 146, title V, § 505
May 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 113, ch. 218, title VIII, § 801
Mar. 31, 1956, 70 Stat. 81, ch. 154, title III, §§ 301, 302(a)
July 25, 1958, 72 Stat. 418, Pub. L. 85-558, §§ 1-5
Sept. 14, 1961, 75 Stat. 510, Pub. L. 87-238, §§ 1-5
Mar. 2, 1962, 76 Stat. 17, Pub. L. 87-408, § 401
Sept. 30, 1966, 80 Stat. 855, Pub. L. 89-610, title I, § 101(a)
Oct. 31, 1969, 83 Stat. 175, Pub. L. 91-106, title V, § 501(a), (b)
Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-73, § 3, 24 DCR 7066
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, § 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(9), 30 DCR 5927
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-159, § 25(b), (c), 32 DCR 30
July 25, 1989, D.C. Law 8-17, § 7(a), 36 DCR 4160
May 4, 1990, D.C. Law 8-119, § 2, 37 DCR 1738
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
This section is referenced in § 25-903 and § 25-905.
1981 Ed., § 25-901.
1973 Ed., § 25-124.